Mississippi statutes. Title 43. Public Welfare
Article 9. Community Development.

§ 43-35-501.
Short title.

This article shall be known and may be cited as the “Community Development Law.”

HISTORY:
Laws, 1980, ch. 441, § 1, eff from and after passage (approved May 2, 1980).

§ 43-35-503.
Authority of counties, municipalities and housing authorities with respect to community development grants.

Any county, municipality, regional housing authority, or local housing authority in the state may make application to and contract with the United States or any department thereof for a grant or grants authorized to be made by the United States under the authority of the Housing and Community Development Act of 1974, as amended (42 USCS 5301 et seq., as amended), and to comply with all the terms and conditions of such grant or grants.

In addition to the powers granted to counties, municipalities, regional housing authorities, and local housing authorities under the Housing Authorities Law (Sections 43-33-1 through 43-33-53), Sections 43-33-61 through 43-33-69, Sections 43-33-101 through 43-33-137, the Urban Renewal Law (Sections 43-35-1 through 43-35-37), and Sections 43-35-301 through 43-35-315, a county, municipality, regional housing authorities, and local housing authorities shall have all the powers necessary or convenient to carry out the programs which are the subject of the grant or grants for which it has so contracted under this section, including, but not limited to, the power to buy, lease or sell real or personal property obtained through the use of or in connection with such grant or grants, and the power to loan funds received under such grant or grants to nonprofit community and economic development corporations, private corporations organized for profit, partnerships, limited partnerships, joint ventures, or other persons, for the purposes of creating job opportunities and to promote local industrial or economic development. A county, municipality, regional housing authority, or local housing authority may charge interest on such loans, if contracted, and may invest or reloan the proceeds of the principal and interest from such loans. However, such loans shall be made only from funds obtained from such grant or grants, or from income produced by such grant or grants.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1980, ch. 441, § 2; Laws, 1988, ch. 364, eff from and after passage (approved April 18, 1988).

§ 43-35-504.
Block grants for improvements to existing public water systems; viability requirement and determination; viability exceptions.

Except as provided in subsections (2) and (3) of this section, the Executive Director of the Mississippi Development Authority shall not award a community development block grant to any county or municipality for the purpose of making improvements, including expansions, rehabilitation or repair, to an existing public water system, unless that system is determined to be viable. The Mississippi Development Authority may require any applicant for which a determination of viability is required under this section to submit information deemed necessary by the executive director for that determination. A preliminary determination of viability shall be made by the Executive Director of the Mississippi Development Authority following receipt of a written recommendation on viability from the State Health Officer and the Executive Director of the Public Utilities Staff. The recommendation of the State Health Officer and the Executive Director of the Public Utilities Staff shall be based on information received from the Mississippi Development Authority and any other information available to the State Department of Health or Public Utilities Staff, as applicable. The State Department of Health and the Public Utilities Staff shall assist the Mississippi Development Authority in developing appropriate forms as required for implementation of this section.

Within five (5) days following a preliminary determination that a public water system is not viable by the Executive Director of the Mississippi Development Authority, the executive director shall provide written notice by certified mail, return receipt requested to the owner or president of the board of the system and the governing authority of the applicant. The notice shall contain the reasons for the determination of nonviability. The owner or president of the board of the system may appeal the preliminary determination to the Executive Director of the Mississippi Development Authority, who shall make a final determination.

The Executive Director of the Mississippi Development Authority may award a community development block grant to any county or municipality for the purpose of making improvements, including expansions, rehabilitation or repair, to an existing public water system, if after receipt of a written recommendation from the State Health Officer and the Executive Director of the Public Utilities Staff, the Executive Director of the Mississippi Development Authority makes a final determination that the public water system may become viable as the result of the grant award. The Executive Director of the Mississippi Development Authority may also award a grant if an extreme emergency exists. In making a grant award, the Executive Director of the Mississippi Development Authority may impose any conditions on the grant deemed necessary after consultation with the State Health Officer and the Executive Director of the Public Utilities Staff, including, but not limited to, interconnection with another existing system or satellite or contract management.

A determination of viability shall not be required for the award of grants relating to a portable water supply necessary for the operation of a municipal sewage treatment system.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1998, ch. 500, § 1; Laws, 2000, ch. 349, § 1; Laws, 2001, ch. 371, § 1; reenacted and amended, Laws, 2002, ch. 422, § 1; Laws, 2010, ch. 359, § 1, eff from and after passage (approved Mar. 15, 2010.).

§ 43-35-505.
Provisions to be supplemental.

The provisions of this article shall be in addition and supplemental to the powers conferred by any other laws.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1980, ch. 441, § 3, eff from and after passage (approved May 2, 1980).